Louisiana, session 2026, HB90.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 33:2740.70.6(B), (D)(1)(introductory paragraph), (c), and (d) and (2),
and (I) are hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 33:2740.70.6(D)(1)(f) and (g) and (J) are
hereby enacted to read as follows:
§2740.70.6. Ferriday Downtown Entertainment District
* * *
B.(1) The boundaries of the district shall include the area within the
following perimeter: Texas Avenue, EE Wallace Boulevard, Mickey Gilley Avenue,
and First Street.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of Paragraph (1) of this Subsection, the
boundaries of the district shall also include both sides of Greater Street.
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 90 ENROLLED
* * *
D.(1) In order to provide for the orderly development of the district and
effect the purposes of the district, the district shall be administered and governed by
a seven-member nine-member board of commissioners, referred to in this Section
as the "board", composed as follows:
* * *
(c) The chief executive officer of Concordia Bank & Trust member of the
Louisiana House of Representatives who represents District No. 21 shall appoint one
member.
(d) The chief executive officer of Delta Bank member of the Louisiana
Senate who represents District No. 34 shall appoint one member.
* * *
(f) The Concordia Parish Sheriff's Department shall appoint one member.
(g) The governing board of Delta Recreation shall appoint one member.
(2) Members shall serve three-year terms after serving initial terms as
provided in this Paragraph. Three members shall serve three-year initial terms, two
members shall serve two-year initial terms, and two members shall serve one-year
initial terms as determined by lot at the first meeting of the board. The four members
appointed pursuant to Subparagraphs (1)(c), (d), (f), and (g) of this Subsection shall
serve three-year terms after serving initial terms as provided in this Paragraph. Two
members shall serve three-year initial terms, one member shall serve a two-year
initial term, and one member shall serve a one-year initial term as determined by lot
at the first meeting of the board following the appointment of the members.
* * *
I. The officers of the sheriff's department of the parish of Concordia may
patrol the area included within the boundaries of the district and may also make
arrests within such area. If the district ceases to exist, the officers of the sheriff's
department of the parish of Concordia shall no longer be authorized to patrol the area
formerly included within the boundaries of the district or make arrests within such
area.
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 90 ENROLLED
I. J. This Section, being necessary for the welfare of the city and its
residents, shall be liberally construed to effect the purposes thereof.
Section 2.(A) The members of the board of commissioners of the Ferriday
Downtown Entertainment District appointed pursuant to R.S. 33:2740.70.6(D)(1)(a), (b), and
(e) and serving on the effective date of this Act shall continue to serve until the expiration
of their current terms. The successors of such members shall serve three-year terms.
(B) The terms of the one member of the board of commissioners of the Ferriday
Downtown Entertainment District appointed by the chief executive officer of Concordia
Bank & Trust and the one member of the board of commissioners of the Ferriday Downtown
Entertainment District appointed by the chief executive officer of Delta Bank shall terminate
on the effective date of this Act; however, the members shall remain in office until the board
members are appointed as provided in R.S. 33:2740.70.6(D)(1)(c) and (d) as amended and
reenacted by this Act and take office.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.